Vermont, session 2025-2026, S32.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 4255(c) is amended to read:
(c) A permanent or free license may be secured on application to the
Department by a person qualifying as follows:
* * *
(2) A person who is legally blind who is a Vermont resident may receive
a free permanent fishing license upon submittal of proper proof of blindness as
the Commissioner shall require. A person who is legally blind who is a
VT LEG #380026 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.32
2025 Page 2 of 3
resident in a state that provides a reciprocal privilege for Vermont residents
may receive a free one-year fishing license.
(3) A Vermont resident with paraplegia as defined in subdivision
4001(30) of this title or a permanent, severe, physical mobility disability
certified by a physician may receive a free permanent fishing license or, if the
person qualifies for a hunting license, a free combination hunting and fishing
license. A person with paraplegia or a person certified by a physician to have
permanent, severe, physical mobility disability who is a resident of a state that
provides a reciprocal privilege for Vermont residents may receive a free one-
year fishing license or, if the person qualifies for a hunting license, a free one-
year combination fishing and hunting license.
(4) A Vermont resident who is a veteran of the U.S. Armed Forces and
who is, or ever has been, 60 percent disabled as a result of a service-connected
disability may receive a free fishing, hunting, or combination hunting and
fishing license that shall include all big game licenses, except for a moose
license, upon presentation of a certificate issued by the veterans’
administration so certifying. A resident of a state that provides a reciprocal
privilege for Vermont veterans and who would qualify for a free license under
this subdivision if the person were a Vermont resident may receive a free one-
year fishing, hunting, or combination hunting and fishing license.
VT LEG #380026 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.32
2025 Page 3 of 3
(5) A person participating in a fishing tournament for Special Olympics
may receive a free fishing license valid for that event.
* * *
(7) A certified citizen of a Native American Indian tribe that has been
recognized by the State pursuant to 1 V.S.A. chapter 23 may receive free of
charge one or all of the permanent fishing, hunting, or trapping licenses set
forth in subdivisions (1)(A)–(D) of this subsection if qualified for the license
and upon submission of a current and valid tribal identification card.
(8) A person with developmental disabilities who is a Vermont resident
may receive a free permanent fishing license upon submission to the
Commissioner of a statement signed by the person’s physician certifying that
the person meets the definition of a person with development disabilities. “A
person with developmental disabilities” has the same meaning as in 18 V.S.A.
§ 9302.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380026 v.1